Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. On June 14, 2025, Minnesota house of representatives speaker Emerita Melissa Hortman of the democratic caucus and her husband Mark Hortman were stalked and murdered. On that same day, Minnesota state senator of the democratic caucus John Hoffman and his wife Yvette Hoffman were stalked and shot by the same alleged individual who murdered representative Hortman and her husband.It is the intent of the legislature to streamline more efficient communication and prevent needless violence by creating an optional emergency notification system for public officials. This system will alert all public officials as soon as practicable when any enrolled public official contacts a 911 emergency communications system and upon confirmation of a targeted threat to any public official. Had an emergency notification system been implemented in Minnesota, senator Hoffman and his wife could have been notified of representative Hortman and her husband's murder and taken whatever precautions necessary to avoid harm.Therefore, this statewide emergency public official notification system promotes more efficient communication under urgent circumstances to share substantive and useful information between first responders and public officials. This will prevent needless violence and promote safety for all of Washington's public figures in the years to come. NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:(1) The military department, shall establish a statewide emergency public official notification system that:(a) Notifies all public officials that they may voluntarily enroll in the statewide emergency public official notification system. The military department must:(i) Provide enrollment information about the emergency public official notification system to all newly elected public officials within 30 days of the commencement of their term; and(ii) Provide enrollment information about the emergency public official notification system to all current public officials within 30 days of the effective date of this section;(b) Maintains a database of public officials who have voluntarily enrolled in the statewide emergency public official notification system; and(c) Provides emergency notification to all public officials as soon as practicable when any enrolled public official contacts a 911 emergency communications system and upon confirmation of a targeted threat to any public official, enrolled or not. This emergency notification must not include the name, address, or personal information of the individuals who contact the 911 emergency communications system and likewise any individuals targeted.(2) The military department, shall ensure that information submitted to the statewide emergency public official notification system is shared with the statewide 911 emergency communications system as defined in RCW 82.14B.020, to be contained in a database that is intended for the purpose of display at a public safety answering point with incoming 911 voice or data, which is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.(3) The military department shall establish rules and procedures for:(a) Enrollment in the statewide emergency public official notification system;(b) Notification of public officials of enrollment eligibility;(c) Emergency notification of all public officials in the event of a 911 emergency communication by an enrolled public official;(d) Data storage which must be in compliance with existing data protection practices used by law enforcement; and(e) Notification of incidents of statewide impact to the department of enterprise services.(4) The secretary of state may share a list of public officials who are eligible to enroll in the emergency public official notification system with the military department.(5) For the purposes of this section, "public official" means a person holding office under a city, county, or state government, or the federal government who performs a public function and in so doing is vested with the exercise of some sovereign power of government, and includes all assistants, deputies, clerks, and employees of any public officer and all persons lawfully exercising or assuming to exercise any of the powers or functions of a public officer.Sec. 3. RCW 38.52.520 and 2022 c 286 s 6 and 2022 c 203 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:A state 911 coordination office, headed by the state 911 coordinator, is established in the emergency management division of the department. Duties of the office include:(1) Administering the 911 account established in RCW 38.52.540;(2) Seeking advice and assistance from, and providing staff support for the 911 advisory committee;(3) Providing and supporting 911 emergency communications systems, which may include procurement, funding, ownership, and management;(4) Assisting the counties and Washington state patrol public safety answering points by distributing state 911 emergency communications system funding within the priorities identified in RCW 38.52.545. When designated as a primary public safety answering point by the county, the state 911 coordination office may provide funding for Washington state patrol public safety answering point 911 emergency communications systems;(5) Develop forms, submission dates, and methods as necessary for all public safety answering points to submit reports;(6) Providing staff support and assistance to the certification board established under RCW 38.60.030 that includes, but may not be limited to:(a) Establishing forms and procedures necessary to administer chapter 38.60 RCW;(b) Issuing a public safety telecommunicator registration and certification to any applicant who has met the requirements for certification under chapter 38.60 RCW; and(c) Maintaining the official record for the department of all applicants and persons with registrations and certificates under chapter 38.60 RCW;(7) Recommending to the utilities and transportation commission by August 31st of each year the level of the state 911 emergency communications system excise tax established in RCW 82.14B.030(5) for the following year;(8) Establishing rules that:(a) Determine eligible components of the 911 emergency communications system, its administration, and operation that the state and county 911 excise taxes, under RCW 82.14B.030, may be used to fund;(b) Determine how appropriated funds from the state 911 account shall be distributed, considering the baseline level of 911 emergency communications system service needs of individual counties and county-designated Washington state patrol primary public safety answering points for specific assistance; and(c) Specify statewide 911 emergency communications system and service standards, consistent with applicable state and federal law. The authority given to the state 911 coordinator in this section is limited to setting standards as set forth in this section and does not constitute authority to regulate radio communications service companies or interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies; ((and))(9) Annually providing a complete report to the 911 advisory committee on:(a) Efforts to modernize their existing 911 emergency communications system;(b) All public safety answering points expenditures for administrative and operational costs and expenses of the 911 emergency communications system; and(c) Any additional data that may be identified by the 911 advisory committee; and(10) Providing data and information to the military department when any public official enrolled in the statewide emergency public official notification system contacts a 911 emergency communications system and upon confirmation of a targeted threat to any public official as provided in section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, records maintained by the military department for the statewide emergency public official notification system is exempt from public inspection and copying under section 5 of this act.(2) Information maintained by the military department for the statewide emergency public official notification system may be provided to a public official upon a request for inspection.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW to read as follows:All or part of any records, reports, data, or information contained therein maintained by the military department for the statewide emergency public official notification system under chapter 38.52 RCW are exempt from disclosure under this chapter, except as provided in section 4(2) of this act.--- END ---